Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. There are appropriated to the  Department of Human Services, for the
biennium beginning July 1, 2019, out of the General Fund, the following amounts, for the
following purposes:
(1) Central services and
state assessments and
enterprise-wide costs ........ $ 302,087,165
(2) Self-sufficiency and
vocational rehabilitation
services ............................. $ 480,512,670
(3) Child welfare..................... $ 777,187,316
(4) Aging and people with
disabilities and
intellectual/developmental
disabilities programs......... $ 2,260,103,348
(5) Debt service ...................... $ 21,145,370
SECTION 2.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, as the maximum limits for payment
of expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous  Receipts and
Medicare receipts and including federal  funds for indirect cost recovery, Social Security
Supplemental Security Income recoveries  and the Child Care and Development Fund, but
excluding lottery funds and federal funds not  described in this section, collected or received
by the Department of Human Services, for the following purposes:
(1) Central services and
state assessments and
enterprise-wide costs ........ $ 40,672,998
(2) Self-sufficiency and
vocational rehabilitation
services ............................. $ 123,468,269
(3) Child welfare..................... $ 39,019,172
(4) Aging and people with
Enrolled House Bill 5026 (HB 5026-A) Page 1
disabilities and
intellectual/developmental
disabilities programs......... $ 279,268,054
(5) Shared services ................. $ 147,250,491
SECTION 3.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, as the maximum limits for payment
of expenses from federal funds, excluding federal funds described in  section 2 of this 2019
Act, collected or received by the Department of Human  Services, for the following purposes:
(1) Central services and
state assessments and
enterprise-wide costs ........ $ 242,582,220
(2) Self-sufficiency and
vocational rehabilitation
services ............................. $ 687,106,143
(3) Child welfare..................... $ 540,302,215 
(4) Aging and people with
disabilities and
intellectual/developmental
disabilities programs......... $ 4,491,637,611
SECTION 4.
For the  biennium beginning July 1, 2019, expenditures by the Department
of Human Services for federal supplemental nutrition assistance payments are not limited.
SECTION 5. (1) In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation,  there is appro-
priated to the Emergency Board, for the biennium beginning July  1, 2019, out of the General
Fund, the amount of $4,000,000, to be allocated  to the Department of Human Services to
support implementation of the federal Family First  Prevention Services Act by increasing
capacity to provide in-home and evidence-based services.
(2) If  any of the moneys appropriated by subsection (1) of this section are not allocated
by the Emergency Board  prior to December 1, 2020, the moneys remaining on that date be-
come available for any purpose for which the Emergency Board lawfully may allocate  funds.
SECTION 6. This 2019 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2019 Act takes effect
July 1, 2019.
Enrolled House Bill 5026 (HB 5026-A) Page 2
Passed by House June 24, 2019
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 29, 2019
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
..................................................................................
Bev Clarno, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 5026 (HB 5026-A) Page 3